District of Columbia statutes.
16-3706

Publication against defendant.

When the officer’s return of a writ of replevin is that he has taken possession of the goods and chattels sued for, but indicates that personal service on the defendant could not be made, the court, subject to the provisions of section 13-340 as to mailing notice, may order that the defendant appear to the action by a fixed day. The plaintiff shall cause notice of the order to be given by publication in a newspaper published in the District at least three times, the first publication to be at least twenty days before the day fixed for the defendant’s appearance.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 605, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-3707.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-3706.
1973 Ed., § 16-3706.